Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2921.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-701.05, to read: START_STATUTE15-701.05. Physical education instruction; activity requirements; exceptions A. Each school district shall provide daily physical education instruction to students in kindergarten programs and each of grades one through twelve, with at least sixty percent of the physical education instructional time spent in moderate physical activity.  The physical education instruction required by this section must include all of the following: 1. Individual and team activities, including dance. 2. Instruction that exposes students to career pathways relating to health, fitness and sports science. 3. Instruction that is designed to help students develop knowledge, skills and dispositions to be physically active over their lifetimes. B. Each school district shall provide adapted physical education instruction for any student who is a child with a disability as defined in section 15-731 consistent with the student's individualized education program or section 504 plan and with the policies and procedures adopted pursuant to section 15-763. C. A school district may excuse a student from all or part of the physical activity requirements prescribed in subsection A of this section if any of the following applies: 1. The student participates on a school-sponsored athletic team that provides at least _____ minutes of physical activity each week. 2. A physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17 states in writing that physical activity will jeopardize the student's health and well-being. 3. The student is a pupil with chronic health problems as defined in section 15-346 and the student's health does not allow the student to participate in the physical activity. 4. The student's individualized education program team makes a determination to excuse the student from all or part of the physical activity requirements. 5. A student's parent submits a signed statement to the school district requesting that the student be excused from all or part of the physical activity requirements. D. This section does not require students to participate in outdoor physical activities during times of extreme weather. END_STATUTE